Utah statutes.
72-10-119.   Judicial review.

(1)  Any person against whom an order has been entered may obtain judicial review.

(2)  Venue for judicial review of informal adjudicative proceedings is in the district court of the county in which the order was made or the county in which property affected by the order is located.

